fi: Elektroniikka > Tulostus, kopiointi, skannaus ja faksaus > Tulostinten, kopiokoneiden ja faksien lisätarvikkeet > Tulostintarvikkeet: Tulostinrummut ja -rumpupaketit; Tulostinsuodattimet; Tulostimen huoltosarjat; Tulostinmedia ja kalvo; Tulostusnauhat; Tulostuspäät; Muste- ja mustesuihkukasettien täyttöpakkaukset; Muste- ja mustesuihkukasetit
en: Electronics > Print, Copy, Scan & Fax > Printer, Copier & Fax Machine Accessories > Printer Consumables: Printer Drums & Drum Kits; Printer Filters; Printer Maintenance Kits; Printer Media & Film; Printer Ribbons; Printheads; Toner & Inkjet Cartridge Refills; Toner & Inkjet Cartridges
es: Electrónica > Fax, escáner, copiadora e impresora > Accesorios para máquinas de fax, impresoras y fotocopiadoras > Consumibles para impresoras: Kits de tambores de impresoras; Filtros para impresoras; Kits de mantenimiento de impresoras; Soportes y películas para impresora; Cintas para impresoras; Cabezales de impresión; Cartuchos recargados de tinta y tóner; Cartuchos de tinta y tóner
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 多功能事務機 > 印表機/影印機/傳真機配件 > 印表機耗材: 感光鼓和組件; 印表機過濾器; 印表機維護工具組; 印表機介質及膜; 印表機色帶; 列印噴頭; 替換用碳粉匣/墨水匣; 碳粉/墨水匣
hr-HR: Elektronika > Ispis, kopiranje, skeniranje i faksiranje > Dodaci za pisače, fotokopirne i faks uređaje > Potrošni materijal za pisače: Bubnjevi za pisače i kompleti bubnjeva; Filtri za pisače; Kompleti za održavanje pisača; Pisač za medije i filmove; Vrpce za pisače; Glave za pisače; Punjači tonera i inkjet kapsula; Toneri i inkjet kapsula
sv: Elektronik > Utskrift, kopiering, skanning och fax > Tillbehör till skrivare, kopiator och fax > Förbrukningsvaror för skrivare: Trumkit för skrivare; Skrivarfilter; Underhållskit för skrivare; Skrivarmedia och -film; Färgband till skrivare; Skrivarhuvuden; Påfyllning av toner- och bläckpatroner; Toner och bläckstrålepatroner
lt-LT: Elektronika > Spausdinimas, kopijavimas, nuskaitymas ir faksas > Spausdintuvų, kopijavimo aparatų ir fakso aparatų priedai > Spausdintuvų eksploatacinės medžiagos: Spausdintuvų būgnai ir būgnų rinkiniai; Spausdintuvų filtrai; Spausdintuvų priežiūros rinkiniai; Spausdintuvo laikmena ir plėvelė; Spausdintuvų juostelės; Spausdinimo galvutės; Toneris ir rašalas kasetėms pildyti; Tonerio ir rašalo kasetės
ro-RO: Electronice > Imprimare, copiere, scanare și fax > Accesorii pentru imprimante, copiatoare și faxuri > Consumabile pentru imprimante: Cilindri și seturi de cilindri de imprimantă; Filtre pentru imprimante; Seturi de întreținere pentru imprimante; Media și film pentru imprimante; Panglici pentru imprimantă; Capete de imprimare; Reîncărcări cartușe cu toner și cartușe pentru imprimante cu jet de cerneală; Cartușe cu toner și cartușe pentru imprimante cu jet de cerneală
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 打印/复印/扫描/传真 > 打印机、复印机和传真机配件 > 打印机耗材: 打印机硒鼓与硒鼓套件; 打印机过滤器; 打印机维护套件; 打印介质和胶片; 打印机色带; 打印头; 墨粉/墨盒; 硒鼓/墨盒
hu: Elektronika > Nyomtatás, másolás, szkennelés és faxolás > Nyomtató-, fénymásoló- és faxgép-kiegészítők > Nyomtató fogyóeszközök: Nyomtatódobok és dobkészletek; Nyomtatószűrők; Nyomtatókarbantartási készletek; Nyomtatási média és fólia; Nyomtatószalagok; Nyomtatófejek; Toner és tintasugaras patron utántöltés; Toner és tintasugaras patronok
sk-SK: Elektronika > Tlač, kopírovanie, skenovanie a faxovanie > Príslušenstvo k tlačiarňam, kopírkam a faxom > Spotrebný materiál do tlačiarní: Súpravy optických valcov pre tlačiarne; Filtre do tlačiarní; Súpravy na údržbu tlačiarne; Tlačové médiá a fólie; Pásky do tlačiarne; Tlačové hlavy; Náplne do tonerov a atramentových kaziet; Tonerové a atramentové kazety
de: Elektronik > Drucken, Kopieren, Scannen & Faxen > Zubehör für Drucker, Kopierer & Faxgeräte > Drucker-Verbrauchsmaterial: Druckertrommeln & Sets; Druckerfilter; Druckerwartungssets; Druckermedien und -folien; Drucker-Farbbänder; Druckköpfe; Toner & Tintenpatronen; Toner- & Inkjet-Kartuschen
sl-SI: Elektronika > Tiskanje, kopiranje, skeniranje in faksiranje > Dodatki za tiskalnike, kopirne stroje in fakse > Potrošni material za tiskalnike: Bobni za tiskalnike in kompleti bobnov; Filtri za tiskalnike; Kompleti za vzdrževanje tiskalnika; Tiskarski mediji in filmi; Trakovi za tiskalnike; Tiskalne glave; Nadomestna polnila za tonerje in kartuše; Polnila za tonerje in kartuše
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Acessórios de máquinas de fax, copiadoras e impressoras > Itens para impressora: Kits de tambores para impressora; Filtros para impressora; Kits de manutenção para impressoras; Mídia e filmes para impressora; Fitas para impressora; Cabeças de impressão; Recargas de cartucho de toner e jato de tinta; Toner e cartuchos de tinta
nl: Elektronica > Afdrukken, kopiëren, scannen en faxen > Accessoires voor printers, kopieerapparaten en faxmachines > Verbruiksartikelen voor printer: Printertrommels en -trommelkits; Printerfilters; Onderhoudskits voor printer; Printermedia en film; Printerlinten; Printerkoppen; Navullingen voor toner- en inkjetcartridges; Toner- en inkjetcartridges
ru: Электроника > Печать, копирование, сканирование и работа с факсами > Аксессуары для принтеров, копиров и факсов > Расходные материалы для принтеров: Фотобарабаны и блоки фотобарабанов для принтеров; Фильтры для принтеров; Наборы для обслуживания принтеров; Носители и пленки для принтеров; Ленты для принтеров; Печатающие головки; Тонеры и чернила для заправки картриджей; Тонер-картриджи и чернильные картриджи
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > พิมพ์ คัดลอก สแกน และแฟกซ์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องพิมพ์ เครื่องถ่ายเอกสาร และแฟกซ์ > ของสิ้นเปลืองสำหรับเครื่องพิมพ์: ดรัมและชุดดรัมของเครื่องพิมพ์; ตัวกรองเครื่องพิมพ์; ชุดบำรุงรักษาเครื่องพิมพ์; กระดาษและฟิล์มเครื่องพิมพ์; ริบบอนของเครื่องพิมพ์; หัวพิมพ์; ชุดรีฟิลล์สำหรับเลเซอร์และอิงค์เจ็ต; ตลับหมึกเลเซอร์และอิงค์เจ็ท
ko: 전자기기 > 인쇄/ 복사/스캔/팩스 > 프린터/복사기/팩스 부대용품 > 프린터 소모품: 프린터 드럼/드럼 키트; 프린터 필터; 프린터 관리 키트; 프린터 용지 및 필름; 프린터 리본; 프린트 헤드; 토너/잉크젯 카트리지 리필; 토너/잉크젯 카트리지
bg-BG: Електроника > Печат, копиране, сканиране и факс > Аксесоари за принтери, копирни машини и факс машини > Консумативи за принтери: Тонер касети и комплекти; Тонер касети; Комплекти за поддръжка на принтери; Носители и филм за принтер; Ленти за принтери; Печатащи глави; Тонери и мастила за мастиленоструен печат; Тонер и мастиленоструйни касети
fr: Appareil électronique > Impression, copie, numérisation et télécopie > Accessoires pour imprimantes, copieurs et télécopieurs > Matériel pour imprimante: Tambours et kits de tambour pour imprimantes; Filtres pour imprimante; Kits de maintenance pour imprimante; Supports et films pour imprimante; Rubans pour imprimante; Têtes d’impression; Recharges pour cartouches d’encre et toners; Cartouches d’encre et toners
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Εκτύπωση, Αντιγραφή, Σάρωση & Φαξ > Αξεσουάρ εκτυπωτών, φωτοαντιγραφικών & φαξ > Αναλώσιμα εκτυπωτών: Τύμπανα εκτυπωτών & κιτ τυμπάνων; Φίλτρα εκτυπωτών; Κιτ συντήρησης εκτυπωτών; Μέσα & φιλμ εκτυπωτή; Ταινίες εκτυπωτών; Κεφαλές εκτύπωσης; Αναγομώσεις τόνερ & μελανοδοχείων Inkjet; Τόνερ & μελανοδοχεία Inkjet
ja: 電子機器 > プリンター・コピー機 > プリンター・コピー機関連用品 > プリンター消耗品: プリンター用ドラム・ドラムセット; プリンター用フィルター; プリンターメンテナンスキット; プリンター用メディアとフィルム; プリンター用リボン; プリントヘッド; 充填用トナー・インクカートリッジ; トナー・インクカートリッジ
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > In, photocopy, quét & fax > Phụ kiện máy in, máy photocopy và máy fax > Vật tư máy in: Trống máy in và bộ dụng cụ trống; Bộ lọc máy in; Bộ dụng bảo dưỡng máy in; Giấy in và phim; Băng mực máy in; Đầu in; Hộp đựng mực in và mực in phun; Hộp mực in & mực in phun
nb: Elektronikk > Utskrift, kopi, skann og faks > Tilbehør til skrivere, kopimaskiner og faksmaskiner > Forbruksmateriell til skrivere: Skrivertromler og trommelsett; Skriverfiltre; Vedlikeholdssett for skrivere; Skrivermedier og film; Fargebånd til skrivere; Skriverhoder; Kassettpåfylling for toner- og blekkskrivere; Kassetter til toner- og blekkskrivere
tr: Elektronik > Yazıcı, Fotokopi, Tarayıcı ve Faks > Yazıcı, Fotokopi Makinesi ve Faks Makinesi Aksesuarları > Yazıcı Sarf Malzemeleri: Yazıcı Tamburları ve Tambur Setleri; Yazıcı Filtreleri; Yazıcı Bakım Kitleri; Yazıcı Ortamları ve Filmleri; Yazıcı Şeritleri; Baskı Kafaları; Toner ve Püskürtmeli Kartuş Doldurma; Toner ve Mürekkep Püskürtme Kartuşları
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Acessórios de impressora, copiadora e fax > Consumíveis de impressora: Tambores de impressora e kits de tambor; Filtros de impressora; Kits de manutenção de impressora; Suportes e filmes de impressora; Fitas de impressora; Cabeças de impressora; Recargas de cartuchos de tinta e toner; Cartuchos de tinta e toner
da: Elektronik > Udskriv, kopiér, scan og fax > Tilbehør til printer, kopimaskine og fax > Printer – forbrugsstoffer: Printer – tromlesæt; Printer – filtre; Printer – vedligeholdelsessæt; Printermedier og -film; Printer – farvebånd; Printhoveder; Genopfyldelige toner- og inkjetpatroner; Tonere og inkjetpatroner
it: Elettronica > Stampa, copia, scansione e fax > Accessori per stampanti, fotocopiatrici e fax > Materiali di consumo stampante: Kit e tamburi per stampanti; Filtri per stampante; Kit di manutenzione stampanti; Supporti e pellicole per stampanti; Nastri per stampante; Testine di stampa; Ricambi per cartucce a getto di inchiostro e toner; Toner e cartucce a getto d'inchiostro
pl: Elektronika > Drukowanie, kopiowanie, skanowanie i faksowanie > Akcesoria do kopiarek, drukarek i faksów > Materiały eksploatacyjne do drukarek: Bębny i zestawy bębnów do drukarek; Filtry do drukarek; Zestawy do konserwacji drukarek; Papier i folia drukarska; Taśmy do drukarek; Głowice do drukarek; Zestawy do napełniania kartridży; Tonery i kartridże atramentowe
cs: Elektronika > Tisk, kopírování, skenování a faxování > Příslušenství k tiskárnám, kopírkám, skenerům a faxům > Spotřební zboží pro tiskárny: Válce do tiskáren; Filtry do tiskáren; Sady pro údržbu tiskáren; Tisková média a fólie; Pásky do tiskáren; Tiskové hlavy; Náplně do laserových a inkoustových tiskáren; Tonery a inkousty